North Carolina statutes. Chapter 110. Child Welfare.
Article 7. Child Care Facilities.
§ 110-94.
Administrative Procedure Act.

The provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes shall be applicable to the Commission, to the rules the Commission adopts, and to child care contested cases. However, a child care operator shall have 30 days to file a petition for a contested case pursuant to

G.S. 150B-23

. The contested case hearing shall be scheduled to be held within 120 days of the date the petition for a hearing is received, pursuant to

G.S. 150B-23

(a), in any contested case resulting from administrative action taken by the Secretary to revoke a license or Letter of Compliance or from administrative action taken in a situation in which child abuse or neglect in a child care facility has been substantiated. A request for continuance of a hearing shall be granted upon a showing of good cause by either party.

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1975, c. 879, s. 15; 1977, c. 929, s. 2; 1985, c. 757, s. 155(m); 1987, c. 788, s. 8; 1989, c. 429; 1991, c. 273, s. 8; 1997-506, s. 11.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Norming in Administrative Law,” see 68 Duke L.J. 1384 (2019).

For article, “Agency Statutory Abnegation in the Deregulatory Playbook,” see 68 Duke L.J. 1509 (2019).

For article, “The Administrative Law of Regulatory Slop and Strategy,” see 68 Duke L.J. 1651 (2019).

For article, “Rulemaking Inaction and the Failure of Administrative Law,” see 68 Duke L.J. 1805 (2019).

For essay, “Sludge and Ordeals,” see 68 Duke L.J. 1843 (2019).

§§ 110-95 through 110-97.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 929, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to administrative hearings, and judicial review of administrative decisions, see

G.S. 150B-1

et seq.

§ 110-98.
Mandatory compliance.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Offer or provide child care without complying with the provisions of this Article; or

Advertise without disclosing the child care facility’s identifying number that is on the license or the letter of compliance.

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1985, c. 757, s. 156(ee); 1987, c. 788, s. 9; 1997-506, s. 12.

§ 110-98.1.
Prima facie evidence of existence of child care.

A child care arrangement providing child care for more than two children for more than four hours per day on two or more consecutive days shall be prima facie evidence of the existence of a child care facility.

History.

1977, c. 4, s. 6; 1987, c. 788, s. 10; 1997-506, s. 13.

§ 110-98.5.
Care for school-age children during state of emergency.

Notwithstanding any provision of law or rule to the contrary, when remote or virtual learning is required due to a declared state of emergency issued under

G.S. 166A-19.20

, the following shall apply:

A community-based organization is authorized to provide care for school-age children at a remote learning facility, provided the community-based organization is registered with the Department through a process consistent with the registration process the Department uses for licensed child care facilities. For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions shall apply:

Community-based organizations. — Organizations of demonstrated effectiveness that are representative of a community or significant segments of a community that provide educational or related services to individuals in the community, such as parks and recreation programs, YMCAs, YWCAs, and Boys and Girls Clubs.

Remote learning facility. — A building or space used to house school-age children during the school year for the purpose of facilitating online or remote learning.

When providing care to school-age children pursuant to this section, the limitations regarding the maximum amount of screen time for children three years of age and older shall not apply.

Care provided to school-age children pursuant to this section is not considered child care as defined under

G.S. 110-86

.

History.

2020-97, s. 3.7A(a).

§ 110-99.
Possession and display of license.

It shall be unlawful for a child care facility to operate without a current license authorized for issuance under

G.S. 110-88

.

(a1)

Each child care facility shall display its current license in a prominent place at all times so that the public may be on notice that the facility is licensed and may observe any rating which may appear on the license. Any license issued to a child care facility under this Article shall remain the property of the State and may be removed by persons employed or designated by the Secretary in the event that the license is revoked or suspended, or in the event that the rating is changed.

A person who provides only drop-in or short-term child care as described in

G.S. 110-86(2)

d. and

G.S. 110-86(2)

d1., excluding drop-in or short-term child care provided in churches, shall register with the Department that the person is providing only drop-in or short-term child care. Any person providing only drop-in or short-term child care as described in G.S. 110-86(2)d. and G.S. 110-86(2)d1., excluding drop-in or short-term child care provided in churches, shall display in a prominent place at all times a notice that the child care arrangement is not required to be licensed and regulated by the Department and is not licensed and regulated by the Department.

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1997-506, s. 14; 1999-130, s. 4; 2003-192, s. 2; 2005-416, s. 2.

§ 110-100.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 15.

§ 110-101.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 16.

§ 110-101.1.
Corporal punishment banned in certain “nonlicensed” homes.

The use of corporal punishment as a form of discipline is prohibited in those child care homes that are not required to be licensed under this Article but that receive State or federal subsidies for child care unless this care is provided to children by their parents, stepparents, grandparents, aunts, uncles, step-grandparents, or great-grandparents. Care provided children by their parents, stepparents, grandparents, aunts, uncles, step-grandparents, or great-grandparents is not subject to this section. Religious sponsored nonlicensed homes are also exempt from this section.

History.

1993, c. 268, s. 1; 1997-506, s. 17.

§ 110-102.
Information for parents.

The Secretary shall provide to each operator of a child care facility a summary of this Article for the parents, guardian, or full-time custodian of each child receiving child care in the facility to be distributed by the operator. Operators of child care facilities shall provide a copy of the summary to each child’s parent, guardian, or full-time custodian before the child is enrolled in the child care facility. The child’s parent, guardian, or full-time custodian shall sign a statement attesting that he or she received a copy of the summary before the child’s enrollment. The summary shall include the name and address of the Secretary and the address of the Commission. The summary shall explain how parents may obtain information on individual child care facilities maintained in public files by the Division of Child Development. The summary shall also include a statement regarding the mandatory duty prescribed in

G.S. 7B-301

of any person suspecting child abuse or neglect has taken place in child care, or elsewhere, to report to the county Department of Social Services. The statement shall include the definitions of child abuse and neglect described in the Juvenile Code in

G.S. 7B-101

and of child abuse described in the Criminal Code in

G.S. 14-318.2

and

G.S. 14-318.4

. The statement shall stress that this reporting law does not require that the person reporting reveal the person’s identity.

The summary of this Article shall be posted with the facility’s license in accordance with

G.S. 110-99

. Religious-sponsored programs operating pursuant to

G.S. 110-106

shall post the summary in a prominent place at all times so that it is easily reviewed by parents.

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1975, c. 879, s. 15; 1977, c. 1011, s. 3; 1985, c. 757, ss. 155(o), 156(v); 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1997-506, s. 18; 1998-202, s. 13(w); 2003-196, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on health care regulation, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 857 (1978).

§ 110-102.1.
Reporting of missing or deceased children.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 14-318.5

, operators and staff, as defined in

G.S. 110-86(7)

, and G.S. 110-91(8), or any adult present with the approval of the care provider in a child care facility as defined in

G.S. 110-86(3)

and

G.S. 110-106

, upon learning that a child which has been placed in their care or presence is missing, shall immediately report the missing child to law enforcement. For purposes of this Article, a child is anyone under the age of 16.

If a child dies while in child care, or of injuries sustained in child care, a report of the death must be made by the child care operator to the Secretary within 24 hours of the child’s death or on the next working day.

History.

1985, c. 392; 1987, c. 788, s. 12; 1997-506, s. 19; 2013-52, s. 4.

Cross References.

As to failure to report the disappearance of a child to law enforcement generally, see

G.S. 14-318.5

.

§ 110-102.1A.
Unauthorized administration of medication.

It is unlawful for an employee, owner, household member, volunteer, or operator of a licensed or unlicensed child care facility as defined in

G.S. 110-86

, including child care facilities operated by public schools and nonpublic schools as defined in

G.S. 110-86

(2)(f), to willfully administer, without written authorization, prescription or over-the-counter medication to a child attending the child care facility. For the purposes of this section, written authorization shall include the child’s name, date or dates for which the authorization is applicable, dosage instructions, and signature of the child’s parent or guardian. For the purposes of this section, a child care facility operated by a public school does not include kindergarten through twelfth grade classes.

In the event of an emergency medical condition and the child’s parent or guardian is unavailable, it shall not be unlawful to administer medication to a child attending the child care facility without written authorization as required under subsection (a) of this section if the medication is administered with the authorization and in accordance with instructions from a bona fide medical care provider. For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:

A bona fide medical care provider means an individual who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized to prescribe the medication.

An emergency medical condition means circumstances where a prudent layperson acting reasonably would have believed that an emergency medical condition existed.

A violation of this section that results in serious injury to the child shall be punished as a Class F felony.

Any other violation of this section where medication is administered willfully shall be punished as a Class A1 misdemeanor.

History.

2003-406, s. 2.

§ 110-102.2.
Administrative penalties.

For failure to comply with this Article, the Secretary may:

Issue a written warning and a request for compliance;

Issue an official written reprimand;

Place a licensee upon probation until his compliance with this Article has been verified by the Commission or its agent;

Order suspension of a license for a specified length of time not to exceed one year;

Permanently revoke a license issued under this Article.

The issuance of an administrative penalty may be appealed as provided in

G.S. 110-90(5)

and

G.S. 110-90(9)

.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 156(ff); 1987, c. 788, s. 13; c. 827, s. 235.

§ 110-103.
Criminal penalty.

Any person who violates the provisions of

G.S. 110-98

shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Violations of

G.S. 110-98

(2), 110-99(b), 110-99(c), and 110-102 are exempted from the provisions of this subsection.

It shall be a Class I felony for any person who operates a child care facility to:

Willfully violate the provisions of

G.S. 110-99(a)

, or

Willfully violate the provisions of this Article while providing child care for three or more children, for more than four hours per day on two consecutive days.

Any person who violates the provisions of this Article and, as a result of the violation, causes serious injury to a child attending the child care facility, shall be guilty of a Class H felony.

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section, and has a prior conviction for violating subsection (a), shall be guilty of a Class H felony.

History.

1971, c. 803, s. 1; 1983, c. 297, s. 3; 1985, c. 757, s. 156(gg); 1987, c. 788, s. 14; 1993, c. 539, s. 824; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1997-506, s. 20; 2003-192, s. 1.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Educational programs operated by public schools for three- and four-year-old children

are not subject to licensure and regulation by the Child [Day] Care Commission. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Harry E. Wilson, Legal Specialist, North Carolina Department of Public Instruction, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 36 (1990).

Educational programs for three- and four-year-old children housed in public school buildings but operated by private providers

are subject to licensure and regulations by the Child [Day] Care Commission. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Harry E. Wilson, Legal Specialist, North Carolina Department of Public Instruction, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 36 (1990).

State is not prohibited from purchasing day care services from day care programs operated by public schools,

even though those programs are not licensed by the Child [Day] Care Commission. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Harry E. Wilson, Legal Specialist, North Carolina Department of Public Instruction, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 36 (1990).

§ 110-103.1.
Civil penalty.

A civil penalty may be levied against any operator of any child care facility who violates any provision of this Article. The penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation documented on any given date. Every operator shall be provided a schedule of the civil penalties established by the Commission pursuant to this Article.

In determining the amount of the penalty, the threat of or extent of harm to children in care as well as consistency of violations shall be considered, and no penalty shall be imposed under this section unless there is a specific finding that this action is reasonably necessary to enforce the provisions of this Article or its rules.

A person who is assessed a penalty shall be notified of the penalty by registered or certified mail. The notice shall state the reasons for the penalty. If a person fails to pay a penalty, the Secretary shall refer the matter to the Attorney General for collection.

The clear proceeds of penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 156(gg); 1987, c. 788, s. 15; c. 827, s. 236; 1991, c. 273, s. 9; 1997-506, s. 21; 1998-215, s. 75.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Educational programs operated by public schools for three- and four-year-old children

are not subject to licensure and regulation by the Child [Day] Care Commission. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Harry E. Wilson, Legal Specialist, North Carolina Department of Public Instruction, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 36 (1990).

Educational programs for three- and four-year-old children housed in public school buildings but operated by private providers

are subject to licensure and regulations by the Child [Day] Care Commission. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Harry E. Wilson, Legal Specialist, North Carolina Department of Public Instruction, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 36 (1990).

State is not prohibited from purchasing day care services from day care programs operated by public schools,

even though those programs are not licensed by the Child [Day] Care Commission. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Harry E. Wilson, Legal Specialist, North Carolina Department of Public Instruction, 60 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 36 (1990).

§ 110-104.
Injunctive relief.

The Secretary or the Secretary’s designee may seek injunctive relief in the district court of the county in which a child care facility is located against the continuing operation of that child care facility at any time, whether or not any administrative proceedings are pending. The district court may grant injunctive relief, temporary, preliminary, or permanent, when there is any violation of this Article or of the rules promulgated by the Commission or the Commission for Public Health that threatens serious harm to children in the child care facility, or when a final order to deny or revoke a license has been violated, or when a child care facility is operating without a license, or when a child care facility repeatedly violates the provisions of this Article or rules adopted pursuant to it after having been notified of the violation.

History.

1977, c. 4, s. 5; c. 929, s. 3; c. 1011, s. 1; 1985, c. 757, s. 156(hh); 1987, c. 543, s. 7; c. 788, s. 16; c. 827, s. 237; 1997-506, s. 22; 2007-182, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 2, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Commission for Public Health” for “Commission for Health Services.”

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on health care regulation, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 857 (1978).

§ 110-105.
Authority to inspect facilities.

The Department shall have authority to inspect facilities without notice when it determines there is cause to believe that an emergency situation exists or there is a complaint alleging a violation of licensure law. When the Department is notified by the county director of social services that the director has received a report of child maltreatment in a child care facility, or when the Department is notified by any other person that alleged child maltreatment has occurred in a facility, the Commission’s rules shall provide for an inspection conducted without notice to the child care facility to determine whether the alleged child maltreatment has occurred. The inspection shall be conducted within seven calendar days of receipt of the report. Additional visits shall be conducted, as warranted.

(a1)

The Commission shall adopt standards and rules under this subsection which provide for the following types of inspections:

An initial licensing inspection, which shall not occur until the administrator of the facility receives prior notice of the initial inspection visit;

A plan for visits to all facilities, including announced and unannounced visits, which shall be confidential unless a court orders its disclosure;

An inspection that may be conducted without notice, if there is cause to believe that an emergency situation exists or there is a complaint alleging a violation of licensure law.The Department, upon presenting appropriate credentials to the operator of the child care facility, may perform inspections in accordance with the standards and rules promulgated under this subsection. The Department may inspect any area of a building in which there is reasonable evidence that children are in care or in which the Department has cause to believe that conditions in that area of a building pose a potential risk to the health, safety, or well-being of children in care.

If an operator refuses to allow the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee to inspect the child care facility, the Secretary shall seek an administrative warrant in accordance with

G.S. 15-27.2

.

History.

1983, c. 261, s. 1; 1985, c. 757, s. 156(ii); 1987, c. 788, s. 17; c. 827, s. 238; 1991, c. 273, s. 10; 1997-506, s. 23; 2015-123, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-123, s. 6, effective January 1, 2016, added subsection (a); redesignated and rewrote former subsection (a) as subsection (a1).

§ 110-105.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 24.

§ 110-105.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-123, s. 7, effective January 1, 2016.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 156(w); 1987, c. 788, s. 19; 1997-506, s. 25; 1998-202, s. 13(x); 2003-407, s. 2; repealed by 2015-123, s. 7, effective January 1, 2016.

§ 110-105.3.
Child maltreatment.

The purpose of this section is to assign the authority to investigate instances of child maltreatment in child care facilities to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education. The General Assembly recognizes that the ability to properly investigate child maltreatment in licensed child care facilities is dependent upon the cooperation of State and local law enforcement agencies, as well as county departments of social services.

The following definitions shall apply in this Article:

Caregiver. — The operator of a licensed child care facility or religious-sponsored child care facility, a child care provider, as defined in G.S. 110-90.2(a)(2), a volunteer, or any person who has the approval of the provider to assume responsibility for children under the care of the provider.

Child care facilities. — Any of the following:

All facilities required to be licensed under this Article.

All religious-sponsored facilities operating pursuant to

G.S. 110-106

.

All locations where children are being cared for by someone other than their parent or legal guardian that require a license under this Article but have not been issued a license by the Department.

Child maltreatment. — Any act or series of acts of commission or omission by a caregiver that results in harm, potential for harm, or threat of harm to a child. Acts of commission include, but are not limited to, physical, sexual, and psychological abuse. Acts of omission include, but are not limited to, failure to provide for the physical, emotional, or medical well-being of a child, and failure to properly supervise children, which results in exposure to potentially harmful environments.

The Department, local departments of social services, and local law enforcement personnel shall cooperate with the medical community to ensure that reports of child maltreatment in child care facilities are properly investigated.

When a report of child maltreatment is received, the Department shall make a prompt and thorough assessment to ascertain the facts of the case, the extent of the maltreatment, and the risk of harm to children enrolled at the child care facility. When the report alleges maltreatment meeting the definition of abuse or neglect as defined in

G.S. 14-318.2

and

G.S. 14-318.4

, the Department shall contact local law enforcement officials to investigate the report.

During the pendency of an investigation, the Department may issue a protection plan restricting an individual alleged to have maltreated a child from being on the premises of the facility while children are in care. The Department may also suspend activities at a facility under investigation, including, but not limited to, transportation, aquatic activities, and field trips.

At any time during the pendency of a child maltreatment investigation, the Department may order immediate corrective action as required to protect the health, safety, or welfare of children in care. If the corrective action does not occur within the period specified in the corrective action order, the Department may take administrative action to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the children at the child care facility.

The Department may, in accordance with

G.S. 150B-3(c)

, summarily suspend the license of a child care facility if the Department determines that emergency action is required to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the children in a child care facility regulated by the Department.

In the event the Department determines child maltreatment did not occur in a child care facility, nothing in this section shall prevent the Department from citing a violation or issuing an administrative action based upon violations of child care licensure law or rules based upon its investigation. Citations of violations or administrative actions issued pursuant to this subsection shall not be confidential.

During the pendency of an investigation, all matters regarding the investigation, including, but not limited to, any complaint, allegation, or documentation regarding inspections or the identity of the reporter, shall be held in strictest confidence as provided by subsection (j) of this section. Following a determination that maltreatment has occurred, the investigation findings shall be made public, as well as the date of any visits made pursuant to the investigation, and any corrective action taken, if applicable. DCDEE shall not post on its Internet Web site that a maltreatment investigation occurred if the allegation of maltreatment was unsubstantiated.

Regardless of the Department’s final determination regarding child maltreatment, all information received by the Department during the course of its investigation shall be held in the strictest confidence by the Department, except for the following:

The Department shall disclose confidential information, other than the identity of the reporter, to any federal, State, or local government entity or its agent in order to protect a juvenile from child maltreatment, abuse, or neglect. Any confidential information disclosed to any federal, State, or local government entity or its agent pursuant to this subdivision shall remain confidential with the other government entity or its agent and shall only be redisclosed for purposes directly connected with carrying out that entity’s mandated responsibilities.

The Department shall only disclose information identifying the reporter pursuant to a court order, except that the Department may disclose information identifying the reporter without a court order only to a federal, State, or local government entity that demonstrates a need for the reporter’s name to carry out the entity’s mandated responsibilities.

A district court, superior court, or administrative law judge of this State presiding over a civil matter in which the Department is not a party may order the Department to release confidential information. The court may order the release of confidential information after providing the Department with reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard and then determining that the information is relevant, necessary to the trial of the matter before the court, and unavailable from any other source.

When a report of child maltreatment alleges facts that indicate that a report is required under

G.S. 7B-301

, the Department shall contact the local department of social services in the county where the juvenile resides or is found and make the necessary report.

In performing any duties related to the assessment of a report of child maltreatment, the Department may consult with any public or private agencies or individuals, including the available State or local law enforcement officers, probation and parole officers, and the director of any county department of social services who shall assist in the assessment and evaluation of the seriousness of any report of child maltreatment when requested by the Department. The Department or the Department’s representatives may make a written demand for any information or reports, whether or not confidential, that may in the Department’s opinion be relevant to the assessment of the report. Upon the Department or the Department’s representative’s request and unless protected by attorney-client privilege, any public or private agency or individual shall provide access to and copies of this confidential information and the records required by this subsection, to the extent permitted by federal law and regulations.

The North Carolina Child Care Commission shall adopt, amend, and repeal all rules necessary for the implementation of this section. Rules promulgated subject to this section shall be exempt from the provisions of

G.S. 150B-19.1(e)

and (f).

History.

2015-123, s. 8.

§ 110-105.4.
Duty to report child maltreatment.

Any person who has cause to suspect that a child in a child care facility has been maltreated, as defined by

G.S. 110-105.3

, or has died as the result of maltreatment occurring in a child care facility, shall report the case of that child to the Department. The report may be made orally, by telephone, or in writing. The report shall include information as is known to the person making the report, including (i) the name and address of the child care facility where the child was allegedly maltreated, (ii) the name and address of the child’s parent, guardian, or caretaker, (iii) the age of the child, (iv) the present whereabouts of the child if not at the home address, (v) the nature and extent of any injury or condition resulting from maltreatment, and (vi) any other information the person making the report believes might assist in the investigation of the report. If the report is made orally or by telephone, the person making the report shall give the person’s name, address, and telephone number. Refusal of the person making the report to give a name shall not preclude the Department’s assessment of the alleged maltreatment.

Upon receipt of any report of maltreatment involving sexual abuse of the child in a child care facility, the Department shall notify the State Bureau of Investigation within 24 hours or on the next workday. If sexual abuse in a child care facility is not alleged in the initial report, but during the course of the assessment there is reason to suspect that sexual abuse has occurred, the Department shall immediately notify the State Bureau of Investigation. Upon notification that sexual abuse may have occurred in a child care facility, the State Bureau of Investigation may form a task force to investigate the report.

History.

2015-123, s. 8.

§ 110-105.5.
Child maltreatment registry.

The Department shall establish and maintain a registry containing the names of all caregivers who have been confirmed by the Department of having maltreated a child pursuant to

G.S. 110-105.3

.

Individuals who wish to contest findings under subsection (a) of this section are entitled to an administrative hearing as provided by the Administrative Procedure Act under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A petition for a contested case shall be filed within 30 days of the mailing of the written notice of the Department’s intent to place its findings about the person in the Child Maltreatment Registry.

Individuals whose names are listed on the Registry shall not be a caregiver as defined in G.S. 110-105.3(b)(1) at any licensed child care facility or religious-sponsored child care facility.

No person shall be liable for providing any information for the Child Maltreatment Registry if the information is provided in good faith. Neither an employer, potential employer, nor the Department shall be liable for using any information from the Child Maltreatment Registry if the information is used in good faith for the purpose of screening prospective applicants for employment or reviewing the employment status of an employee. The immunity established by this subsection does not extend to malicious conduct or intentional wrongdoing.

Upon request, a child care facility, as defined in

G.S. 110-105.3

, is permitted to provide confidential or other identifying information to the Department, including social security numbers, taxpayer identification numbers, parent’s legal surname prior to marriage, and dates of birth, for the purpose of verifying the identity of the accused caregiver.

With the exception of the names of individuals listed on the Child Maltreatment Registry, all other information received by or pertaining to the Child Maltreatment Registry shall be confidential and is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes.

In order to determine an individual’s fitness to care for or adopt a child, information from the Child Maltreatment Registry may be used by any of the Department’s divisions responsible for licensing homes or facilities that care for children, and the Department may provide information from this list to child-caring institutions, child-placing agencies, group home facilities, and other providers of foster care, child care, or adoption services.

The North Carolina Child Care Commission shall adopt, amend, and repeal all rules necessary for the implementation of this section.

History.

2015-123, s. 8; 2015-264, s. 56(a).

§ 110-105.6.
Penalties for child maltreatment.

For purposes of this Article, child maltreatment occurring in child care facilities is a violation of this Article, licensure standards, and licensure laws.

Pursuant to

G.S. 110-105.3

, when an investigation confirms that child maltreatment did occur in a child care facility, the Department may issue an administrative action up to and including summary suspension and revocation of the facility’s child care license.

If the facility is permitted to remain open after an administrative action has been issued, the administrative action shall specify any corrective action to be taken by the operator.

The Department shall make unannounced visits to determine whether the corrective action has occurred. If the corrective action has not occurred, then the Department may take further action against the facility as necessary to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the children at the child care facility.

Administrative actions issued shall include a statement of the reasons for the action and shall specify corrective action that shall be taken by the operator.

Under the terms of the administrative action, the Department may limit enrollment of new children until satisfied the situation giving rise to the confirmation of child maltreatment no longer exists.

Specific corrective action required by an administrative action authorized by this Article may include the removal of the individual responsible for child maltreatment from child care pending a final determination or appeal of the individual’s placement on the Child Maltreatment Registry.

Nothing in this section shall restrict the Department from using any other statutory or administrative remedies available.

History.

2015-123, s. 8.

§ 110-106.
Religious sponsored child care facilities.

The term “religious sponsored child care facility” as used in this section shall include any child care facility or summer day camp operated by a church, synagogue or school of religious charter.

Procedure Regarding Religious Sponsored Child Care Facilities. —

Religious sponsored child care facilities shall file with the Department a notice of intent to operate a child care facility and the date it will begin operation at least 30 days prior to that date. Within 30 days after beginning operation, the facility shall provide to the Department written reports and supporting data which show the facility is in compliance with applicable provisions of

G.S. 110-91

. After the religious sponsored child care facility has filed this information with the Department, the facility shall be visited by a representative of the Department to ensure compliance with the applicable provisions of

G.S. 110-91

.

Each religious sponsored child care facility shall file with the Department a report indicating that it meets the minimum standards for facilities as provided in the applicable provisions of G.S. 110-91 as required by the Department. The reports shall be in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission. Each religious sponsored child care facility shall be responsible for supplying with its report the necessary supporting data to show conformity with those minimum standards, including reports from the local and district health departments, local building inspectors, local firemen, volunteer firemen, and other, on forms which shall be provided by the Department.

It shall be the responsibility of the Department to notify the facility if it fails to meet the minimum requirements. The Secretary shall be responsible for carrying out the enforcement provisions provided by the General Assembly in Article 7 of Chapter 110 including inspection to ensure compliance. The Secretary may issue an order requiring a religious sponsored child care facility which fails to meet the standards established pursuant to this Article to cease operating. A religious sponsored child care facility may request a hearing to determine if it is in compliance with the applicable provisions of G.S. 110-91. If the Secretary determines that it is not, the Secretary may order the facility to cease operation until it is in compliance.

Religious sponsored child care facilities including summer day camps shall be exempt from the requirement that they obtain a license and that the license be displayed and shall be exempt from any subsequent rule or regulatory program not dealing specifically with the minimum standards as provided in the applicable provisions of G.S. 110-91. Nothing in this Article shall be interpreted to allow the State to regulate or otherwise interfere with the religious training offered as a part of any religious sponsored child care program. Nothing in this Article shall prohibit any religious sponsored child care facility from becoming licensed by the State if it so chooses.

Religious sponsored child care facilities found to be in violation of the applicable provisions of G.S. 110-91 shall be subject to the injunctive provisions of

G.S. 110-104

, except that they may not be enjoined for operating without a license. The Secretary may seek an injunction against any religious sponsored child care facility under the conditions specified in

G.S. 110-104

with the above exception and when any religious sponsored child care facility operates without submitting the required forms and following the procedures required by this Article.

G.S. 110-91(8), 110-91(11), 110-91(12) do not apply to religious sponsored child care facilities, and these facilities are exempt from any requirements prescribed by subsection (b) of this section that arise out of these provisions.

No person shall be an operator of nor be employed in a religious sponsored child care facility who has been convicted of a crime involving child neglect, child abuse, or moral turpitude, or who is a habitually excessive user of alcohol or who illegally uses narcotic or other impairing drugs, or who is mentally or emotionally impaired to an extent that may be injurious to children.

Each religious sponsored child care facility shall be under the direction or supervision of a literate person at least 21 years of age. All staff counted toward meeting the required staff/child ratio shall be at least 16 years old, provided that persons younger than 18 years old work under the direct supervision of a literate staff person at least 21 years old. Effective January 1, 1998, a person operating a religious sponsored child care home must be at least 21 years old and literate. Persons operating religious sponsored child care homes prior to January 1, 1998, shall be at least 18 years old and literate. The definition of literate in G.S. 110-91(8) shall apply to this subsection.

History.

1983, c. 283, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 757, ss. 155(p), 156(k); 1987, c. 788, s. 20; 1997-506, s. 26.

§ 110-106.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-506, s. 27.